Illinois, session 104th, SB1100.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cigarette Machine Operators' Occupation Tax 5Act is amended by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 128/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Cigarette Machine Operators' Occupation Tax Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-688, eff. 6-14-12.)